Nevada, session 83, SB289.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 244 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
Except as expressly prohibited by statute, a board of county
commissioners may enact any ordinance or measure relating to
affordable housing.
-
*SB289*

– 2 –
Sec. 2. Chapter 268 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
Except as expressly prohibited by statute, the governing body of
an incorporated city may enact any ordinance or measure relating
to affordable housing.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB289*